src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON BÅRRE  !!= @CODE@ participles without the -s attributive. As 1e in Spiik. Sg Acc: bårrev, Attr: bårre. Spiik: presens particip har med den attributiva formen utan -s betydelsen ºdem  som utför handlingenº.
      +A:%>   ATTR_PrsPrc       ;
      +A:%>   NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
      +A:%>X4 ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
      +A:%>Q4 N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
      +A:%>   MUORRACmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: ednabårre # Even-syllable test
!!€ ednabårre:              ednabårre+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ ednabårrev:             ednabårre+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ ednabårre:             ednabårre+A+Attr


!LEXICON DÁBBELIJ !!= @CODE@ presenty only for "Dábbelij". Sg Acc: dábbelaháv, Attr: dábbelij. Similar forms are analyzed as adpositions and adverbss (dábbela, dábbelin). This lexica is thus outcommented as it is not an adjective.
!                 +A+Sg+Nom:ij%>   K                 ;
!                       +A:ij%>   ATTR              ;
! +A:ij VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
! +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ahá%>  PxV               ; !
!                    +A+Ess:ahá%>n ENDLEX            ;
!                        +A:ahá%>  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
!                        +A:ahá%>  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
!        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahá%>t ENDLEX            ;
!                        +A:ahá%>  BU/MUS            ;
!               +A+Cmp/SgGen:ahá%>  R                 ;
!               +A+Cmp/PlGen:ahá%>j R                 ;

!! Test data:
!!!€gt-norm: dábbelij # Even-syllable test
!!!€ dábbelij             dábbelij+A+Sg+Nom
!!!€ dábbelaháv           dábbelij+A+Sg+Acc
!!!€ dábbelij             dábbelij+A+Attr
!!!€ dábbelaháp           dábbelij+A+Comp+Sg+Nom


!!
!! Loan words lexicas
!!


!! ! Correctly assimilated loanwords, derived from real noun.


LEXICON MEKANIHKALASJ !!= @CODE@ LOAN! Foreign -isk adjectives adapted in updated normative way. To smj ending -alasj, adjective is truly derived from a noun. Mekanisk-mekanihkka-mekanihkalasj, instead of mekánalasj that goes to MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS. Pred and attr are both -alasj. No comparatives. 

+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;

! +A:asj VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR


LEXICON MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL 

                          :%>     ATTR           ;
                   +Sg+Nom:%>     ENDLEX         ;
          +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a%>    PxV            ; !
                          :a%>    SURGULASJ-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1t ENDLEX         ;
                +Cmp/SgNom:%>     R              ;
                +Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R              ;
                +Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R              ;
               
! +A:a%>Q1 BU/MUS ;
! +A: VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: kapitalismalasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ kapitalismalasj:             kapitalismalasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ kapitalismalattjav:          kapitalismalasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ kapitalismalasj:             kapitalismalasj+A+Attr


LEXICON IJJALASJ !!= @CODE@ Just lik MEKANIHKALASJ only for words ending on ijjalasj/iddjalasj, so that we don't need a lot of Area and Err tags in stems file.

+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: IJJALASJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON IJJALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ 

         +Area/NO:ijjaladtj  MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
         +Area/SE:idjaladtj  MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth:ialadtj    MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth:iddjaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth:ijaladtj   MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth:aladtj     MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
  

LEXICON OGIJJALASJ !!= @CODE@ Just like IJJALASJ only for words ending on ogijjalasj/ogiddjalasj, so that we don't need a lot of err tags in stems files. For words like "pedagogijjalasj" which also have "pedagåvgålasj" (not really a wrong derivation, but doesn't mean pedagogisk) and "pedagogalasj" err taged.  
 
+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: OGIJJALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
  
LEXICON OGIJJALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ 
  
  +Area/NO:ogijjaladtj  MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
  +Area/SE:ogidjaladtj  MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:ogiddjaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:ogijaladtj   MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:ogialadtj    MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:ogaladtj     MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:åvgåladtj    MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ; !Not really a wrong derivation but it means someting else than the norwegian -isk adjective. "Pedagåvgålasj" we get from the noun pedagåvggå. 
  


LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ !!= @CODE@ -sjonal/sjonell and -tional/tionel loanwords. Only for words that work as nouns, so that they are REAL dervations, as nasjonal-nasjåvnnå-nasjåvnålasj. NOT for words like "rasjonell", with no real noun. Words as "rasjonell>rasjonálla-rasjonálalasj" go to lexicon ÁLLA.  The fake derivation "nasjonálalasj" is err taged, so is the strange "nasjonálla/nasjunálla". 

+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: SJÅNÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ 

                            :sjåvnåladtj      MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:sjonálaladtj     MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ; ! Makes BADASS "nasjonálalasj"
        +Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:sjunálaladtj     MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ; ! Makes BADASS "nasjunálalasj"
+Err/Orth+Area/SE+Use/-Spell:tionálaladtj     MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ; ! Makes BADASS "nationálalasj"
           +Err/Orth+Area/SE:sjonáll          ÁLLA-ÆLLA              ; ! Makes strange "nasjonálla"
           +Err/Orth+Area/SE:tionáll          ÁLLA-ÆLLA              ; ! Makes strange "nationálla"
           +Err/Orth+Area/SE:sjunáll          ÁLLA-ÆLLA              ; ! Makes strange "nasjunálla"

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: konstitusjåvnålasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ konstitusjåvnålasj:             konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ konstitusjåvnålattjav:          konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ konstitusjåvnålasj:             konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Attr


!! ! Badly assimilated loanwords, some against norm others with no norm

LEXICON MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS !!= @CODE@ LOAN! Wronly assimilated -lasj adjectives fro SE/NO -isk. Looks derived but isn't since there is no real noun to be derived from. Like mekanisk-mekánalasj, but "mekádna" is no real noun! Like MEKANIHKALASJ, but gives the Use/-Spell tag, so it's only for these wronly/non-derived loan adjectives. 

+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last+Use/-Spell: MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL ;

 

LEXICON ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED
+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: ARKTALASJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ARKTALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Foreign -isk, that are not real derivations. Same as MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS, but no +Use/-Spell tag since ther is no "right" way to assimilate these. This is a question for GG. Adapted to smj by simply adding -alasj in place of -isk. These are not real derivations, but sitation borrowed loan adjectives. Only words without a noun base, like arktisk and syntetisk. Pred and attr are both -lasj. No comparatives. 

! +A:asj VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR

! +A: VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                          :%>     ATTR          ;
                   +Sg+Nom:%>     ENDLEX        ;
          +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a%>    PxV           ; !
                          :a%>    SURGULASJ-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
! +A:a%>Q1 BU/MUS ;
         +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1t ENDLEX        ;
                 +Cmp/SgNom:%>     R             ;
                 +Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R             ;
                 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R             ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: syntetalasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ syntetalasj:           syntetalasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ syntetalattjav:        syntetalasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ syntetalasj:           syntetalasj+A+Attr
