src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
allergijjalasj:allerg IJJALASJ ;
anatomijjalasj:anatom IJJALASJ ;
arkeologijjalasj:arkeol OGIJJALASJ ;
arktalasj:arktaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
automatihkalasj+Err/Orth:automahtaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !
biografijjalasj+Err/Orth:bio^gráffaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !^LOAN
biografijjalasj:biograf IJJALASJ ; !^LOAN
biologijjalasj:biol OGIJJALASJ ;
bioteknologijjalasj:bio#teknol OGIJJALASJ ;
boargálasj:boargáladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; ! ????
bårre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bårºre BÅRRE ; !
demografijjalasj:demo^graf IJJALASJ ; !^LOAN
demokratijjalasj+Err/Orth:demo^kráhtaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
demokratijjalasj:demo^krat IJJALASJ ;
dimensjåvnålasj:dimen  SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! ^LOAN
dramatihkalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dramatihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; !
dramatihkalasj+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dramataladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !
dutkamstrategijjalasj:dutkam#strateg IJJALASJ ;
dynámalasj:dynámaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
ednabårre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:edna#bårºre BÅRRE ; !
elektrisitiehtalasj+Err/Orth:elektrikaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !LOAN
elektronihkalasj:elektronihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; !LOAN
emosjåvnålasj:emo  SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! ^LOAN
epihkalasj+Err/Orth:epaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !LOAN
estetihkalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:estetihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; !
etihkalasj+Err/Orth:etaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !LOAN
etnografijjalasj+Err/Orth:etno^gráffaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
etnologijjalasj:etnol OGIJJALASJ ;
filmatihkalasj:filmatihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; !^LOAN
fonetihkalasj+Err/Orth:fonehtaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
fonetihkalasj:fonetihkaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
fonologijjalasj:fonol OGIJJALASJ ;
funksjåvnålasj:funk SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! LOAN
genetihkalasj:genetihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ;
geografijjalasj+Err/Orth:geo^gráfaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
geografijjalasj:geo^graf IJJALASJ ;
geologijjalasj:geol OGIJJALASJ ;
giellasosiologijjalasj:giella#sosiol OGIJJALASJ ;
giellateknologijjalasj:giella#teknol OGIJJALASJ ;
grammatihkalasj:grammatihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; 
grekalasj:grekaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; !
gåhtalasj:gåhtaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; ! ????
hierarkijjalasj+Err/Orth:hier^arkaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; 
hierarkijjalasj:hier^ark IJJALASJ ;
humanismalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:humanismaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; !
idiologijjalasj:idio^l OGIJJALASJ ;
iehpeformalalasj:iehpeformalaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; ! ÁLLA
iesjmanne+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iesj#manºne BÅRRE ; !
implikasjåvnålasj:im^plika SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! ^LOAN
intensjåvnålasj:inten SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! LOAN
internasjåvnålasj:inter#na SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! LOAN 
kapitalismalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:kapitalismaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; !
klassihkalasj:klassihkaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
konstitusjåvnålasj:kon^stitu SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ^LOAN 
kyrillalasj:kyrillaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; ! 
legendaralasj:legendaraladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
magijjalasj:mag IJJALASJ ;
matematihkalasj:matematihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ;
mekanihkalasj+Err/Orth:mekanaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
morfologijjalasj:morfol OGIJJALASJ ;
multifunksjåvnålasj:multi#funk SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ^LOAN 
nasjåvnålasj:na SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! LOAN
nuorttarijkalasj:nuorttarijkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ;
observasjåvnålasj:observa SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! ^LOAN
ortografijjalasj:ortograf IJJALASJ ;
parlamentalasj+Err/Orth:parlamentáraladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
pedagogijjalasj:pedag OGIJJALASJ ;
poesijjalasj:poes IJJALASJ ;
praktihkalasj+Err/Orth:práktihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; !
profesjåvnålasj:profe SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! LOAN
projeksjåvnålasj:projek SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! ^LOAN
psykiatrijjalasj:psykiatr IJJALASJ ; !LOAN
rasistalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rasistaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; !
relasjåvnålasj:rela SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! ! ^LOAN
sosiologijjalasj:sosiol OGIJJALASJ ;
statistihkalasj:statistihkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ; ! LOAN
strategijjalasj+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:strategaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !
subarktalasj:sub#arktaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; !What?
suoma-ugralasj+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:finno-ugrálaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; ! 
svierigasuobmelasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:svieriga#suobmeladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; !
syntetalasj+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:syntehtaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; !
teknihkalasj+Area/SE:teknijkaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ ;
teologijjalasj:teol OGIJJALASJ ;
teorijjalasj:te^or IJJALASJ ;
topografijjalasj+Err/Orth:topo^grafaladtj MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
vuododemokratijjalasj:vuodo#demo^krat IJJALASJ ;
vájllo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vájllo BÅRRE ; !
åvtådimensjåvnålasj:åvtå#dimen SJÅNÅLASJ ; ! LOAN
økologijjalasj+Area/SE:ekol OGIJJALASJ ;
økonomijjalasj+Area/NO:økonom IJJALASJ ;
